Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7609
Stop-loss insurance policy; requirements.

(1) A multiple employer welfare arrangement offering a health benefit plan that is not fully insured shall be a named insured under a stop-loss insurance policy that provides coverage in excess of the multiple employer welfare arrangement's retention of one hundred twenty-five percent of the multiple employer welfare arrangement's expected health claims costs as determined on an aggregate basis.

(2) A policy issued to satisfy the requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall:

(a) Be evidenced by a binder or policy by an insurer licensed to transact the business of insurance in this state; and

(b) Contain a provision that the coverage may not be terminated by the insurer unless the multiple employer welfare arrangement and the director receive a written notice of termination from the insurer at least thirty days before the effective date of the termination.

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 9.